examples/07_example.lexd
PATTERNS
Pronouns
VerbRoot VerbInflection 

LEXICON Pronouns
я<prn><1><sg><nom>:я
ты<prn><1><sg><nom>:ты
он<prn><3><sg><m><nom>:он
она<prn><3><sg><f><nom>:она
оно<prn><3><sg><n><nom>:оно

LEXICON VerbRoot
играть<v>:игра

LEXICON VerbInflection
<pst><1><sg><m>:л
<pst><2><sg><m>:л
<pst><3><sg><m>:л
<pst><1><sg><f>:ла
<pst><2><sg><f>:ла
<pst><3><sg><f>:ла
<pst><1><sg><n>:ло
<pst><2><sg><n>:ло
<pst><3><sg><n>:ло
